District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3215

Limit on expenditures for civic center.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-58, § 305, 24 DCR 5765
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 301, 31 DCR 3974
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142,§ 3(i), 45 DCR 4826

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3215.
1973 Ed., § 47-3111.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 901 of D.C. Law 5-113 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.